Massachusetts, session 194th, H830.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "year,” in line 5, the following 
words:- ; provided, however, that the lists shall not include the dates of birth or occupations of 
said persons. 
SECTION 2. Section 7 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
out, in lines 6 to 10, inclusive, the words “name, date of birth, occupation and nationality if not a 
citizen of the United States, of every person who is listed under section four, and his residence 
on January first of the preceding year and of the current year” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- : (1) name; (2) residence on January first of the preceding year; and of the 

of 2 10 current year and (3) nationality, if not a citizen of the United States, of every person who is listed 
pursuant to section 4.